Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of section 11B of chapter 85 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following clause:-
(12) When operating a bicycle on a public way on which motor vehicles are operated, the
operator shall wear a high-visibility shirt or vest in a lime green or yellow color with reflective
material.
SECTION 2. Said section 11B of said chapter 85, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 113, after the words “clause (2)” the following words:- or clause
(12).
SECTION 3. Said section 11B of said chapter 85, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 2

A police officer who observes a violation of clause (12) shall record the operator’s name,
address and license number, if any, and make a record of the violation. A third violation of
clause (12) shall be punished by a fine of not more than $100.
of 2